Washington statutes.
RCW 24.40.030

Articles of incorporation deemed to contain provisions for distribution.

The articles of incorporation of every corporation to which this chapter applies shall be deemed to contain a provision requiring such corporation to distribute, for the purposes specified in its articles of incorporation, for each taxable year, amounts at least sufficient to avoid liability for the tax imposed by section 4942(a) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954.

[ 1971 c 59 s 4.]